North Carolina statutes. Chapter 36A. Trusts and Trustees.
Article 9. Alienability of Beneficial Interest; Spendthrift Trust. [Repealed]

§ 36A-115.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2005-192, s. 1, effective January 1, 2006.

Editor’s Note.

Prior to repeal of this Article, G.S. 36A-116 through 36A-119 had been set out as reserved for future codification purposes.